Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 342.127 is amended to read:
342.127. (1) The Teacher Standards and Practices Commission shall establish and collect:
(a) A fee not to exceed  $350 for evaluation of the initial application for each educator license
for which application is made. If the applicant is  eligible for the educator license for which appli-
cation is made, the commission shall issue the license without additional charge.
(b) A fee not to  exceed $350 for the renewal of each educator license and a fee not to exceed
$50 for each official paper  license. If the educator is certified by a national professional organization
for teaching standards recognized by  the commission, the commission shall renew the license with-
out charge.
(c) A fee not to exceed  $800 for a beginning educator assessment conducted in lieu of an ap-
proved preparation program required for licensure.
(d) A fee  not to exceed $350 for registration as a public charter school teacher or administrator
that includes any fee charged pursuant to rules adopted under ORS 181A.195.
(e) A fee not to exceed $350 for renewal of a registration as a public charter school teacher  or
administrator that includes any fee charged pursuant to rules adopted under ORS 181A.195.
(2) In addition to the fee required by subsection (1) of this  section for the issuance of an edu-
cator license, the  commission shall collect a fee not to exceed $150 for the evaluation of an appli-
cant requesting licensing based upon completion of an educator preparation program other than  an
Oregon approved educator preparation program.
(3) In addition to the fees required by subsection (1) of this section, the commission  shall collect
a late application fee not to exceed $40 per month up to a maximum of  $200 from an applicant who
fails to make timely application for renewal  of the license or registration. The actual amount of the
fee shall be determined in accordance with rules of the commission.
(4) In addition to the fees required by subsection (1) of this section, the commission  shall collect
a late application fee not to exceed $350 for the reinstatement of an  expired license. The require-
ments for  reinstatement and the actual amount of the fee shall be determined in accordance with
rules of the commission.
Enrolled Senate Bill 129 (SB 129-A) Page 1
(5) Notwithstanding the expiration date posted on  the license, the license shall continue to be
valid for an additional 120 days, provided the educator has made a  timely application, as determined
by the commission, for renewal prior to the expiration date on the license.
(6) In addition to the fee required by  subsection (1) of this section for the issuance of an edu-
cator license, the  commission shall collect a fee not to exceed [ $300] $1,000 for the reinstatement
of a license that  has been suspended or revoked by the commission for gross neglect of duty or gross
unfitness under ORS 342.175.
(7) In addition to the fee required by  subsection (1) of this section for the issuance of an edu-
cator license, the commission shall collect a fee  not to exceed $200 for the issuance of any license
through an expedited process  under ORS 342.125 (6) at the request of any school district, public
charter school or education service district that seeks to  employ the applicant. The fee shall be paid
by the school district, public charter school or education service district.
(8)(a) The commission shall establish and collect:
(A) A fee for each approved  educator preparation provider, based on the number of li-
cense applications received by the commission from the provider; and
(B) A fee for each approved educator preparation provider, based on the type of educator
preparation programs that the provider offers.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, the commission may  establish and
collect a flat fee for the purposes described in paragraph (a) of this subsection if the number
of teacher applicants enrolled in the educator preparation programs offered by  the educator
preparation provider does not exceed a number identified by the commission by rule.
(c) The method for determining the  fee and the actual amount of the fee imposed under
this subsection shall be determined in accordance with rules of the commission.
[(8)] (9) Fees established under this section shall cover, but not exceed, the full cost of admin-
istrative expenses incurred by the commission during any biennium.
SECTION 2.
(1) The amendments  to ORS 342.127 by section 1 of this 2021 Act become
operative on January 1, 2022.
(2) The amendments to ORS 342.127 by section 1 of this  2021 Act apply to any license
reinstated on or after January 1, 2022.
SECTION 3. The Teacher Standards and Practices Commission shall report to an interim
committee of the Legislative Assembly  related to education no later than March 1, 2022. The
report must be related to the fees established and collected as  authorized by ORS 342.127,
as amended by section 1 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 4.  ORS 342.127, as amended by section 1 of this 2021 Act, is amended to read:
342.127. (1) The Teacher Standards and Practices Commission shall establish and collect:
(a) A fee not to exceed $350 for evaluation of the initial  application for each educator license
for which application is made. If the applicant is  eligible for the educator license for which appli-
cation is made, the commission shall issue the license without additional charge.
(b) A fee not to exceed $350 for the renewal of each educator license and a  fee not to exceed
$50 for each official paper  license. If the educator is certified by a national professional organization
for teaching standards recognized by the commission, the commission shall  renew the license with-
out charge.
(c) A fee not to exceed $800 for a beginning educator assessment conducted  in lieu of an ap-
proved preparation program required for licensure.
(d) A fee  not to exceed $350 for registration as a public charter school teacher or administrator
that includes any fee charged pursuant to rules adopted under ORS 181A.195.
(e) A fee not to exceed $350 for renewal of a registration as a public charter school teacher  or
administrator that includes any fee charged pursuant to rules adopted under ORS 181A.195.
(2) In addition to the fee required by  subsection (1) of this section for the issuance of an edu-
cator license, the commission shall collect a fee not to exceed $150 for the evaluation of  an appli-
cant requesting  licensing based upon completion of an educator preparation program other than an
Oregon approved educator preparation program.
Enrolled Senate Bill 129 (SB 129-A) Page 2
(3) In addition to the fees required by subsection (1) of this section, the commission  shall collect
a late application fee not to exceed $40 per month up to a maximum of  $200 from an applicant who
fails to make timely application for renewal  of the license or registration. The actual amount of the
fee shall be determined in accordance with rules of the commission.
(4) In addition to the fees required by subsection (1) of this section, the commission  shall collect
a late application fee not to exceed $350 for the reinstatement of an  expired license. The require-
ments for  reinstatement and the actual amount of the fee shall be determined in accordance with
rules of the commission.
(5) Notwithstanding the expiration date posted on  the license, the license shall continue to be
valid for an additional 120 days, provided the educator has made a  timely application, as determined
by the commission, for renewal prior to the expiration date on the license.
(6) In addition to the fee required by subsection (1) of this  section for the issuance of an edu-
cator license, the commission shall collect a fee not to exceed $1,000 for the reinstatement of a  li-
cense that has been suspended or revoked by  the commission for gross neglect of duty or gross
unfitness under ORS 342.175.
(7) In addition to the fee required by  subsection (1) of this section for the issuance of an edu-
cator license, the commission shall collect a fee  not to exceed $200 for the issuance of any license
through an expedited process  under ORS 342.125 (6) at the request of any school district, public
charter school or education service district that seeks to  employ the applicant. The fee shall be paid
by the school district, public charter school or education service district.
[(8)(a) The commission shall establish and collect: ]
[(A) A fee for each approved educator preparation provider, based on the number of license  appli-
cations received by the commission from the provider; and ]
[(B) A  fee for each approved educator preparation provider, based on the type of educator prepa-
ration programs that the provider offers. ]
[(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this  subsection, the commission may establish and collect a
flat fee for the purposes described in paragraph  (a) of this subsection if the number of teacher appli-
cants enrolled in the educator preparation programs offered by the educator  preparation provider does
not exceed a number identified by the commission by rule. ]
[(c) The method  for determining the fee and the actual amount of the fee imposed under this sub-
section shall be determined in accordance with rules of the commission. ]
[(9)] (8) Fees established under this section shall cover, but not exceed, the full cost of admin-
istrative expenses incurred by the commission during any biennium.
SECTION 5. The amendments to ORS 342.127 by  section 4 of this 2021 Act become oper-
ative on January 1, 2026.
SECTION 6. Any moneys in the National Board Certification Fund on  June 30, 2021, that
are unexpended, unobligated and not subject  to any conditions shall be transferred to the
Teacher Standards and Practices Commission Account.
SECTION 7. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 129 (SB 129-A) Page 3
Passed by Senate June 23, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 25, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 129 (SB 129-A) Page 4